3 Conclusion No.
Management Structures The Polk County School District's Management Structures need some improvement.
One needed improvement is the definition of the functions of its organizational units.
The district also needs to address limitations of its Management Information Systems and develop a plan for the formal evaluation of its programs and operations.
___________________________________________________
As shown below, the district is using 10 of the 13 best financial management practices for management structures.
In particular, the district periodically reviews its organizational structure, staffing levels, and purchasing practices.
The district also has a strategic plan in place, and considers local options to increase revenue.
However, the district has not clearly defined the functions of each of its organizational units.
In addition, the district does not have a formal process for evaluating the performance of its major programs, and the district's management information systems need to be ugraded.
Below are OPPAGA's conclusions on the district's use of each management structures' best practice.
Is the District Using the Management Structures Best Practices? Organizational Structure and Staffing Levels The district has not clearly defined the functions of each of its organizational units.
(page 3-5) levels to minimize administrative layers and processes.
(page 3-8)
Yes.
The district periodically reviews its organizational structure and staffing Yes.
The board exercises oversight of the district's financial resources but has not received training on district budgeting.
(page 3-20)
Yes.
The district has clearly assigned authority to school administrators for the effective and efficient supervision of instruction, instructional support, and other assigned responsibilities, including consideration of site-based decision making and other organizational alternatives.
(page 3-22)
OPPAGA
3-1
Management Structures
Decision Making and Resource Allocation Yes.
The district does have a multi-year strategic plan but it could be improved to better identify strategic priorities and include more measurable objectives.
(page 3-24)
Yes.
The district has a system to accurately project enrollment.
(page 3-25) Yes.
The district does regularly assess its progress toward its strategic goals and objectives.
(page 3-27)
Yes.
The district does have an ongoing system of financial planning and budgeting linked to achievement of district goals and objectives, including student performance.
(page 3-28)
No.
No.
The district's management information systems do not provide data needed by management and instructional personnel in a reliable, timely, and costefficient manner.
(page 3-29) The district does not periodically conduct formal evaluations of operations to use the results to improve the quality of education and reduce costs.
(page 3-32)
Yes.
The district considers local options to increase revenue.
(page 3-35) Yes.
The district uses cost-efficient legal services to review policy and reduce the risk of lawsuits.
(page 3-36)
Yes.
The district periodically evaluates the prices it pays for goods and services and, when appropriate, uses state-negotiated contracts, competitive bidding, outsourcing, or other alternatives to reduce costs.
(page 3-37)
Fiscal Impact of Recommendations
______________________
Most of the recommendations in the management structures section will improve district performance, but are neutral in terms of their fiscal impact.
As shown in Exhibit 3-1, two recommendations will have a fiscal impact.
In addition, OPPAGA has recommended that the district use federal funds available through the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) to hire school-based Exceptional Student Education (ESE) clerical staff.
This recommendation should be fiscally neutral in terms of requiring an investment of state or local funds, but should enhance the district's ability to avoid budget shortfalls related to difficulty implementing the state's ESE funding mechanism.
3-2
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-1
Implementing the Recommendations for Management Structures Will Have the Following Fiscal Impact Recommendation Establish new senior director of Information Systems and Technology position.
Provide training in district budgeting and finance to school board members.
Fiscal Impact This recommendation will require a recurring investment of $80,000 in salary, plus an estimated $20,950 in benefits, per year.
1 This recommendation will require an investment in Fiscal Year 1999-2000 of an estimated $800 for a one day on-site Florida School Boards Association (FSBA) technical training workshop.
The estimated cost includes a $350 per day consultant fee.
Additional training will be required every two to four years if new members are elected to the board.
1 The $80,000 salary estimate is based on national average salary information presented in the 1997-98 American Almanac of Jobs and Salaries for similar positions in the field of education.
It may need to be adjusted to reflect salaries in the Polk County market and to take into account district fringe benefits.
Background
__________________________________________________
The Polk County School District has undergone a number of changes within the last three years.
In 1996, county voters elected a new superintendent and passed a referendum to increase the district's school board membership from five to seven members.
In 1998, the district made major changes to its organizational structure and downsized its central administration.
In addition to these changes, there has been considerable turnover in school board membership.
School board members are elected every four years.
Although one member has served for over 12 years on the board, six of the district's school board members are serving their first term.
Exhibit 3-2 shows the length of time board members have served and their experience.
Exhibit 3-2
Polk's School Board Members Are Relatively New Board Member Jim Nelson Chair Jim Miles
Tenure Elected in 1996; first term as board member Elected in 1996; first term as board member
Experience Former vice mayor and city commissioner; Publix store manager; background in business management Thirty-two year employee of Polk School District and former director of Staff Development; background in business education, guidance, and curriculum and instruction
OPPAGA
3-3
Management Structures
Board Member Bob Macey
Tenure Elected in 1998; first term as board member Elected in 1996; first term as board member
Experience President of Bartow Steel; background in economics, business management and finance Former partner in public relations firm; background in political science, health services administration, and community services Graduate of Polk County school system; former president of the Florida School Boards Association; background in exceptional education Graduate of Polk County school system; former Polk County school system teacher, coach, and districtwide student attendance assistant Native of Polk County; owner of insurance agency; background in business administration and finance
Brenda Reddout
Andrea Whiteley
First elected in 1986; third term as board member Elected in 1998; first term as board member
Larry Peacock
C.J. "Jack" English III
Appointed by Governor in 1998; elected in 1998; first term as board member
Source: Polk County School District.
The district school board and management team have had some notable accomplishments over the last three years.
Exhibit 3-3 describes these accomplishments.
Exhibit 3-3
Notable Accomplishments in Management Structures · · · · · · · · · · · Contracted for two major reviews of the district's organizational structure, staffing levels, and compensation structure Increased school board membership from five to seven members Restructured schools in Fort Meade community Supported the establishment of four charter schools Adopted a comprehensive core curriculum for elementary education based on Florida Sunshine State Standards and Core Knowledge Sequence Improved the performance of two schools sufficiently to have them removed from the Commissioner of Education's low performing school list Received grants for sustained and improved test scores at six schools Moved eleventh graders' scores on state High School Competency Test above the state average Improved fourth and tenth graders' performance on Florida Writing Achievement Assessment to meet or exceed state average Improved district's rating from the fifth to the third quintile in Expansion Management's national assessment of school districts Introduced district website with information about schools, school board policy, curriculum, and other information on-line
Source: Polk County School District.
3-4
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Are the Best Practices for Organizational Structure and Staffing Levels Being Observed?
________________________
Goal A: The district's organizational structure and staffing levels ensure that programs operate efficiently and effectively.
1
Does the district have an organizational structure with clearly defined units and lines of authority? Are the organizational structure and lines of authority reflected in the district's organizational charts and job descriptions that are reviewed periodically and updated as necessary? No.
Although the district has an organizational chart, the district has not defined the functions and responsibilities of each of its organizational units.
Furthermore, the school board policy manual needs to be revised, and written procedures for key operations are not available.
The District Should Define Unit Functions and Responsibilities The district's organizational chart clearly depicts the positions and lines of authority in its central administration.
However, the chart does not define the functions and responsibilities of each organizational unit.
While the district has a job description for each position on the chart, the job descriptions do not delineate the scope and limits of position responsibilities.
Because job and unit functions are not clearly defined district staff are not always clear about what their responsibilities are.
(See Chapter 5, page 5-14, for more information about the district's job descriptions.)
Confusion about who is responsible for what can create inefficiency and duplication of effort.
Lack of clarity about unit functions and position responsibilities has impeded the implementation of district initiatives.
For example, in 1998 the school board approved the districtwide purchase of Navigator, a curriculum development and electronic gradebook software package.
The School Technology, Data Processing, Information Services departments and the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation were all involved in the adoption and implementation of this software.
However, confusion about which organizational unit was in charge of its implementation created unnecessary duplication and delay.
The School Improvement Planning process is another area were there is confusion about unit responsibilities.
The duties of the area assistant superintendents and the functions of the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation as they relate to school improvement planning have not been clearly delineated.
As a result, district staff do not have a clear
OPPAGA
3-5
Management Structures
understanding of who is responsible for ensuring the overall quality of school improvement plans.
(The quality of the district's school improvement plans is discussed in more detail in Chapter 4.)
The coordination of training for school principals and teachers is another area where unit responsibilities are not sufficiently clear.
The Division of Instructional Services, area assistant superintendents, and principals all arrange training in curriculum and instruction for school-based personnel.
However, district staff are uncertain about who is responsible for ensuring that this training is well coordinated with the implementation of district initiatives and state directives.
As a result, teachers and principals sometimes receive training that is not entirely consistent with district policy or contradicts what they were told in other training.
The District Should Develop Written Procedures for Key Activities and Revise the School Board Policy Manual The district has several procedures manuals that are up-to-date, widely circulated, and used routinely by district and school-based staff.
Area assistant superintendents and principals, for example, regularly refer to recently updated manuals such as the Pupil Progression Plan.
However, the district does not have written procedures in two areas that affect most aspects of the district's management and operation - data processing and financial management.
Written procedures are especially needed in these two areas to ensure adherence to internal controls, assist in training new staff, and provide continuity when there is turnover in key personnel.
(For more information on the need for written procedures in data processing and financial management, see Chapter 12.)
The district also needs to revise the school board's policy manual.
The manual is updated on an annual basis and published on the district website.
However, the district has not yet completed a review of board policies for compliance with current provisions of the state's Administrative Procedure Act.
The act was revised in 1996 and 1997 to narrow the rulemaking authority of state agencies and local governments.
According to the act, school boards must identify and revise rules that exceed their rule-making authority as defined in statute.
Legislation passed by the 1999 Florida Legislature requires districts to submit a list of any rules they have identified to the Administrative Procedures Committee by October 1, 1999.
The Polk School Board Policy Committee recently established an ad hoc committee to review the board's policy manual to address the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act.
The ad hoc committee will also streamline the manual to make it more user-friendly.
The district's goal is to publish the updated manual on the district's website by the start of the 1999-2000 school year.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
The district should develop written procedures for data processing and financial management.
Action Plans 12-3 and 12-7, in Chapter 12, show the action steps needed to implement this recommendation.
The district should continue the process it has in place to streamline and revise the board's policy manual.
However, the board should develop a timeline for the completion of the key components of this task and designate the board's general
·
3-6
OPPAGA
Management Structures
counsel as the individual responsible for meeting the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act.
· The district should develop functional organization charts that clearly show the responsibilities of each of its organizational units.
When two or more units share responsibility for the same function, the district should develop written descriptions of the limits of each unit's authority and responsibility and how the units are to interact.
Action Plan 3-1 shows the steps the district needs to take to implement these recommendations.
·
Action Plan 3-1
Several Action Steps Are Needed to Implement Recommendations Recommendation 1 Strategy Action Needed Revise and streamline school board policy manual.
Step 1: The board designates responsibility for completion of its policy manual's revision in compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act to its general counsel.
Step 2: The ad hoc policy review committee, general counsel, and Data Processing Department develop a timeline for the review, revision, and publication of the manual on the district website.
Step 3: The board reviews and approves the revised manual.
Step 4: The ad hoc committee meets with the Data Processing Department, general counsel, and district staff to establish a timetable and procedures for the review and revision of the policy manual on an annual basis.
The school board The review of the manual to comply with the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act should be completed by August 30, 1999.
The revised manual should be published on the district website by the end of September 1999.
This can be implemented with existing resources.
Who Is Responsible Time Frame
Fiscal Impact
Recommendation 2 Strategy Action Needed Develop functional organization charts describing each unit's functions and responsibilities.
Step 1: The superintendent assigns the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation responsibility for working with the Human Resource Services Division, assistant superintendents, and department directors to develop a functional organization chart.
Step 2: The superintendent and assistant superintendents identify the functions of each organizational unit and develop a functional organization chart for each unit.
Step 3: The superintendent, assistant superintendents, and the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation review the functional 3-7
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
charts to ensure that they comply with the district's strategic plan and clearly delineate responsibility for implementing state directives and district initiatives.
Step 4: The Human Resource Services Division reviews, and if necessary revises, the job descriptions for key positions in each organizational unit to ensure that they are consistent with identified unit functions.
Step 5: The board reviews the functional organization charts and revised job descriptions to ensure consistency with district policies and direct the superintendent to correct any inconsistencies.
Step 6: After correcting any inconsistencies, the superintendent submits the revised job descriptions and functional organizational charts to the board for their approval.
The superintendent The functional organization charts should be completed by the end of November 1999.
This can be implemented with existing resources.
2
Does the district periodically review its organizational structure and staffing levels to minimize administrative layers and processes? Yes.
The district has periodically reviewed and revised its organizational structure and staffing levels.
However, additional organizational changes could improve its functioning.
The District Has Reviewed and Streamlined Its Organizational Structure The district periodically reviews and revises its organizational structure and staffing levels.
In the past four years, Polk has contracted with consultants for two comprehensive organizational studies.
The school board and superintendent reviewed the findings presented in both studies and worked together to develop preliminary recommendations for streamlining the district's central office.
District staff gave input to the consultants conducting the studies and provided feedback to board members on proposed staff reductions and other organizational changes in board meetings.
The school board eventually approved a recommendation package prepared by the superintendent for streamlining the district's central office.
These recommendations went into effect in 1998 when the district underwent a major reorganization and reduction in staffing levels.
The district downsized central office staff by 29 positions.
The district also reduced its number of administrative divisions from seven to five.
For example, the Division of Vocational Adult and Community Education was changed to a department and moved to the Instructional Services Division.
3-8
OPPAGA
Management Structures
The District Has Reviewed and Adjusted Staffing Levels The district reviews its administrative and instructional staffing levels on a regular basis.
The staffing plan for school-based personnel is reviewed and updated annually by the district's Staffing Plan Committee and presented to the school board for its approval.
Staffing plans for the Transportation Services and the Facilities and Operations divisions are also reviewed and approved by the school board.
The district has also used the results of reviews conducted by outside consultants to assess its staffing levels.
The two organizational studies referred to above compared Polk's staffing ratios to those of other districts for school years 1991-92 through 1996-97.
These ratios include "instructional staff per administrator," "students per administrator," "instructional staff per school-based administrator," and "students per school-based administrator."
Based on these ratios, Polk's overall staffing levels for the past several years appear to be appropriate for a district of its size and number of schools.
In addition, the reviews showed that Polk has steadily reduced the size of its central administrative staff over the past several years.
Polk's overall instructional and administrative staffing levels are similar to those of its peer districts.
For example, according to Department of Education data, Polk's average class size for elementary, middle school, and high school is close to the statewide average.
Exhibit 3-4 shows how Polk's 1997-98 average elementary class size compares with those of its peer districts.
Exhibit 3-4
For School Year 1997-98, Polk's Average Elementary Class Size Was Comparable to Peer Averages 25.1
23.6 17.3
23.9
23.2
23.7
Brevard
Duval
Pinellas
Polk
Seminole
Volusia
Source: 1997-98 Florida School Indicators Report, Department of Education.
Comparison with peer district staffing ratios for the current school year suggests that Polk does not have an unreasonably high or low number of administrative staff.
As shown in Exhibit 3-5, the total staff-to-administrator ratio in Polk compares favorably to the ratios of its peer districts.
As shown in Exhibits 3-6 and 3-7, Polk has about the same number of instructional staff and classroom teachers per administrator as its peer districts.
OPPAGA
3-9
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-5
Polk's Total Staff-to-Administrator Ratio Resembles the Ratio of Peer Districts 2 9 .3 2 3 .9 3 1 .8 2 8 .3 3 1 .6 3 1 .6
Brevard
Duval
Pinellas
P o lk
Se m i n o le
V o l u s ia
Source: Staff in Florida's Public Schools, Fall 1998, Department of Education.
Exhibit 3-6
Polk's Instructional Staff-to-Administrator Ratio Resembles the Ratio of Peer Districts 30.0 25.0 20.0 15.0 10.0 5.0 0.0
1 7 .1 1 4 .7
1 5 .6
1 6 .9
1 8 .3
1 6 .6
Brevard
Duva l
Pinellas
Polk
Se m inole
V o l usia
Source:
Staff in Florida's Public Schools, Fall 1998, Department of Education.
3-10
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-7
Polk's Classroom Teacher-to-Administrator Ratio Resembles Ratio in Peer Districts
1 4 .3 1 2 .3 1 1 .0 1 0 .3 1 2 .5 1 1 .5
Brevard
Duval
Pinellas
Polk
S e m i n o le
Volusia
Source:
Staff in Florida's Public Schools, Fall 1998, Department of Education.
Alignment of Related Functions Could Improve Efficiency The district could improve its organizational and management structure to better coordinate the implementation of school board policy and district initiatives.
For example, both the area assistant superintendents and Division of Instructional Services monitor and support the implementation of the district's curriculum initiatives at the school level.
The assistant superintendent of Instructional Services is responsible for districtwide adherence to school board curriculum policy.
Area assistant superintendents oversee the implementation of district initiatives and serve as the major communication link between schools and the central office.
However, as shown in Exhibit 3-8, area assistant superintendents report directly to the district superintendent, while the assistant superintendent of Instructional Services reports to the associate superintendent.
As a result, the organizational structure provides no mechanism for coordinating the activities of the area assistant superintendents with the work performed by Instructional Services and other division staff.
We recommend that the district consider options to improve the coordination of these activities.
Options include revising the organizational structure to have the area assistant superintendents report to the associate superintendent or establishing an instructional leadership team.
The instructional leadership team would consist of the area assistant superintendents and the assistant superintendent of Instructional Services.
The purpose of this team would be to coordinate and align the monitoring, support, and implementation of instructional programs.
In order to foster coordination, this team should meet at least monthly to discuss activities and current initiatives.
The district's organizational structure could also be improved by realigning its technology functions and situating these functions at a higher level in the district's organization.
As shown in Exhibit 3-9 and 3-10, the district's technology functions are carried out by three separate units--the Information Services and Data Processing departments in the Business Services Division and the School Technology Department in the Division of Instructional
OPPAGA
3-11
Management Structures
Services.
Staff report that the separation of related functions has hindered coordination of district efforts to upgrade its information and instructional technology.
For example, staff experienced difficulty coordinating deadlines and delegating responsibilities for implementation of the district's new e-mail system.
We recommend that the district create a new Information Services and Technology unit to house Data Processing, Information Services, and School Technology.
We also recommend that this new unit be situated on the organizational level directly under the superintendent to reflect the significance of information technology as a districtwide resource.
3-12
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-8
Polk County Schools - Current Organizational Structure Public/Constituents
School Board
Superintendent of Schools School Board Auditor Attorneys
Associate Superintendent
Assistant Superintendent Instruction Services
Assistant Superintendent Business Services
Assistant Superintendent Human Resource Services
Assistant Superintendent Transportation Services
Assistant Superintendent Facilities/ Operations
Director Community Relations
Director Polk Education Foundation
Senior Director Planning, Accountability and Evaluation
Director, Student Discipline Programs, Security
Director, Intervention Services, District Lobbyist
Assistant Superintendent Northwest Area Source: Polk County School Board, July 14, 1998.
Assistant Superintendent East Area
Assistant Superintendent North Central Area
Assistant Superintendent South Central Area
Assistant Superintendent Southwest Area
OPPAGA
3-13
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-9
Polk County Schools ­ Existing Division of Instructional Services
Assistant Superintendent Instructional Services
Administrative Secretary
Supervisor Title I
Director Fine Arts, Magnet, Choice, and Charter Schools Director Elementary Education
Director Secondary Education
Academic Competitions Manager
Director Exceptional Student Education (ESE) Director Student Services
Director Career, Technical, Adult Education
Director School Technology
Coordinator Workforce Development
Source: Polk County School Board, July 14, 1998.
3-14
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-10
Polk County Schools - Existing Business Services Division
Assistant Superintendent Business Services
Administrative Secretary
Accounting Director
Risk Management Director
Finance Director
Purchasing and Warehousing Director
Food Service Director
Data Processing Director
Information Services Director
Source: Polk County School Board, July 14, 1998.
OPPAGA
3-15
Management Structures
The district could also improve the alignment of its planning and desegregation monitoring functions.
As shown in Exhibit 3-9, the district's Magnet, Choice and Charter School functions are currently placed in the Instructional Services Division with the supervision of Fine Arts.
The district established its Choice and Magnet programs for the purpose of meeting the needs of court-ordered desegregation.
Magnet, choice, and charter schools must be constantly evaluated in terms of their impact on the racial composition of school populations throughout the district.
However, responsibility for monitoring district compliance with the desegregation court order is assigned to the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation.
In addition, the establishment and support of each magnet, choice, and charter school requires decisions that must be made within the framework of the district's overall school planning process.
The organizational placement of the Magnet, Choice and Charter School unit with the district's planning and desegregation monitoring unit would result in a more efficient alignment of these related functions.1
ESE Support Services May Be Staffed Inadequately Over the past four years, Polk has decentralized the delivery of Exceptional Student Education (ESE) support services.
The district established a satellite ESE office in each of its five regions with a regional coordinator and three staffing specialists in each office.
In 1997-98 Polk also downsized the Exceptional Student Education Department, eliminating eight central office positions.
While principals report that decentralization has generally improved teachers' access to ESE support services, there is evidence to suggest that these services are inadequately staffed.
The district has been unable to effectively address changes required by the state's new funding mechanism for exceptional education.
In addition, the district has had difficulty complying with state and federal ESE programming regulations.
In 1997, the Legislature changed the state's funding mechanism for exceptional education programs from a model based on the student's type of exceptionality to a model based on the services the student receives.
Since implementing the new model--the Matrix of Services--the district has been unable to provide the Department of Education with accurate estimates of its ESE enrollment.
The district significantly over-projected the FTE funds that would be generated by its ESE students in the 1998-99 school year.
As a result, it faces a significant shortfall in anticipated state funding.
Polk could get an estimated $8 million less in state funding for the 1998-99 school year than it had planned for in its 1998-99 budget.
Polk's difficulty implementing the new funding mechanism accounts for most of this shortfall.
According to the Department of Education, the district initially used the matrix incorrectly, assigning a significant portion of its ESE students to too high a matrix service level.
Consequently, the district's October 1997 FTE survey results were inflated.
Polk based its forecast for the 1998-99 school year on this survey, and this forecast was used to determine the district's 1998-99 allocation.
The funding a district actually receives over the school year is recalculated by the Department of Education after each FTE survey.
The FTEs generated for ESE students in Polk's 1998 October and February 1999 surveys fell short of the amount originally appropriated by approximately $8 million.
The district has one year to revise its matrix level assignments and adjust its FTE count for exceptional education students for the 1998-99 school year.
Consequently, Polk may While this Best Financial Management Practices review was taking place, the district made plans to move the Magnet, Choice and Charter School functions to the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation.
The board recently approved a new position for a Magnet, Choice and Charter School director.
1
3-16
OPPAGA
Management Structures
recover a portion of the $8 million in state funding.
However, this process will require a significant investment of staff time and resources; staffing specialists and ESE teachers will have to review the Individual Education Plan and documentation for each student's matrix.
In addition, this will provide only a short-term or reactive solution to the district's financial problem.
To avoid funding shortfalls over the long term, the district needs to provide teachers with sufficient training and on-going technical support to ensure that they use the matrix correctly.
The district has been unable to accomplish this goal with existing staff resources.
The district has also experienced difficulty complying with federal and state ESE regulations.
Based on the findings of an Auditor General review of 1997-98 school year files, the district's board auditor recently estimated that an unacceptable percentage of the district's overall exceptional student records may be out of compliance with state and federal requirements related to parental notification or three-year re-evaluations.
District staff indicate that the percentage may be as high as 40% .
Lack of compliance places the district at-risk of lawsuits and loss of state funding.
Federal Funding Is Available to Hire ESE Clerical Staff The district's Exceptional Student Education Department is exploring ways to address difficulties with the matrix and increase compliance with state and federal regulations.
For example, the department has developed a computer program to automatically track how matrix levels are being assigned in order to identify schools that need special training and assistance.
In addition, the department recently employed a consultant to examine the district's implementation of the matrix and use of ESE staff resources.
According to the consultant, Polk could target its staff resources more cost-effectively if it hired school-based clerical staff to perform routine ESE paperwork and data entry.
Currently, the district's ESE teachers spend a considerable portion of their time doing paperwork to meet federal and state requirements and staffing specialists perform data entry functions that are assigned to lower-cost clerical employees in most other school districts.
Employing school-based ESE clerical staff to assume these responsibilities would significantly reduce the workload of ESE teachers and staffing specialists.
As a result, they would have more time to address program backlogs, such as the significant number of three-year re-evaluations that are past due.
In addition, teachers would have more time to receive training on how to use the matrix correctly and staffing specialists would have more time to provide this training and monitor compliance with state and federal requirements.
Overall, this arrangement would provide schools with additional resources, while enhancing the district's ability to increase program compliance and resolve matrix funding problems without rebuilding its ESE central office staff.
District staff estimate that one full-time clerk would be required to handle the average workload for two or three schools; 50-53 clerical staff would be required districtwide.
Federal funding can be used to support the district's investment in school-based ESE clerical staff.
Through the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), school districts receive an annual federal entitlement for exceptional student education.
The funding each district receives is based on its number of students with disabilities.
This past fiscal year, Polk had available $7.7 million in IDEA funding.
OPPAGA
3-17
Management Structures
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
The district should organize in a manner that consolidates responsibility for similar functions and facilitates communication across organizational units.
Exhibits 3-11 and 3-12 contain OPPAGA's recommendations for reorganizing the district.
Our recommendations are personnel neutral.
They are based on our analysis of the district's organizational structure and overall efficiency, not the performance of any individual.
We recommend that the district create a new Information Systems and Technology unit to consolidate the district's technology functions including Information Services, Data Processing, and School Technology.
This unit should be headed by a senior director of Information Systems and Technology, reporting directly to the superintendent.
This unit will address the need for districtwide planning and coordination of technology development.
(See Exhibit 3-11.)
The directors of Information Services, Data Processing and School Technology would report to the senior director of Information Systems and Technology.
(See Exhibit 3-12.)
In addition, this recommendation will reduce the span of control in both the Instructional Services and Business Services divisions.
(See Exhibits 3-9 and 3-10.)
The creation of a senior director of Information Systems and Technology position is estimated to cost approximately $100,950 in annual salary and benefits.
(In Chapter 12, the Auditor General also recommends that the district establish this position.)
We recommend that the district assign Choice, Magnet, and Charter Schools responsibilities to a unit within the Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation.
(See Exhibit 3-11.)
This will align desegregation monitoring and district planning functions.
It will also reduce the span of control for the Instructional Services Division.
(See Exhibit 3-9.)
We recommend that the district consider options to better coordinate the activities of the area assistant superintendents with the activities of other district staff, especially staff in the Instructional Services Division.
One option to improve this coordination is changing the organizational structure to have the area assistant superintendents report to the associate superintendent.
Another option to improve coordination is to create an instructional leadership team that would meet at least once a month to discuss activities and current initiatives.
The instructional leadership team would consist of the area assistant superintendents and the assistant superintendent of Instructional Services.
The purpose of this team would be to coordinate and align, the monitoring, support, and implementation of instructional programs.
We also recommend that the district assess its use of ESE resources, including its use of available Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) funds.
The district should determine how to best target these resources to increase compliance with state and federal ESE regulations and address problems with the state's new funding mechanism.
We recommend that the district use IDEA funds to hire school-based clerical staff to handle routine ESE data entry and paperwork.
The number of positions should be determined after the district has estimated the amount of ESE data entry and routine paperwork required at each school and assessed the immediate and long-term availability of federal funds to support these positions.
·
·
·
·
3-18
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-11
OPPAGA's Recommended Changes in Alignment of Units and Functions
Superintendent of Schools
Senior Director Planning, Accountability and Evaluation · Assessment/Testing · Program evaluation · Desegregation monitoring · Magnet, Choice, and Charter Schools · Grants development · School improvement · Strategic planning
Senior Director Information Systems and Technology · Technology planning and development · Information services · Data processing · School technology
Director Public Information and Community Relations
Director Polk Education Foundation
Associate Superintendent
Assistant Superintendents Programs and Operations
Director Intervention Services
Director Student Discipline
Area Assistant Superintendents
OPPAGA
3-19
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-12
OPPAGA's Recommendations for Information Systems and Technology and Magnet, Choice, and Charter Schools Units
Superintendent of Schools
Senior Director Planning, Accountability and Evaluation Director Magnet, Choice, and Charter Schools
Senior Director Information Systems and Technology Director Data processing
Director Information services Director School technology
3
Do district board members exercise appropriate oversight of the district's financial resources? Yes.
The board exercises appropriate oversight of district resources.
However, the board needs training in school district finance and budgeting.
A number of district practices provide the school board with appropriate oversight of district resources.
The district's budgetary process gives the board ample opportunity to review and approve the manner in which the district allocates its resources.
The board also reviews and approves the expenditure of funds within the budget.
In addition, district staff are required to provide the board with background information on all significant expenditures.
The budgetary responsibilities of the superintendent and school board as defined in statute are clearly described in the board's policy manual.
The superintendent is required to develop a proposed budget and present it to the board.
The board is required to advertise and conduct a public hearing on the budget.
It is the board's responsibility to approve a final budget.
3-20
OPPAGA
Management Structures
The district's budgetary process gives district staff, school personnel, and the public an opportunity to provide the board with input on significant financial issues.
The board allots time for speakers to comment on the proposed budget in the public budget hearing required by law.
In addition, board meetings must be open to the public, so citizens, district staff and teachers have the opportunity to address the board on all items, that the board has under consideration.
2 The district has procedures in place to provide information to the school board on issues of financial importance.
For the past two years, the district has conducted workshops in which district staff brief the board on the proposed budget.
The board also reviews and approves expenditures within the budget after it is approved.
Spending requests are considered as agenda items in school board meetings.
The board may approve routine requests in a blanket motion or identify specific items on the agenda to consider in more detail.
Requests for significant expenditures must be presented to the board by district staff in a work session before they are placed on the board's meeting agenda.
The board requires that expenditures for projects or contracted services of $10, 000 or more be accompanied by a budget impact analysis.
A budget impact analysis includes background information on the spending issue, a breakdown of expenditures, identification of funding sources, targeted population, and expected results.
The board reviews significant financial issues that have been identified in district audits and evaluations.
In school board meetings and work sessions, staff brief the board on the results of internal audits and studies conducted by outside consultants.
The board routinely refers to these findings when making policy and funding decisions.
For example, the board used the results of a compensation study conducted by KPMG to make changes to the district's salary structure in 1998.
The Board Needs Training in District Budgeting The board could improve its oversight of district resources with training on school district budgeting and finance.
Polk County School Board members receive the Florida School Boards Association (FSBA) Master Board Training.
However, the Master Board curriculum does not include training in district budgeting or educational funding.
While most board members have business backgrounds, they are somewhat unfamiliar with state and school district budgeting.
Only one board member has completed FSBA training in the Florida Education Finance Plan and district budgeting.
In addition, the district is moving to a zerobased budgeting system.
Division budgets for 1999-2000 will be zero-based budgets.
District staff and board members will need training in this new approach.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that district school board members receive training in district budgeting and finance.
This training is available through the Florida School Boards Association (FSBA).
FSBA can provide this training in a one-to-two day on-site workshop.
The estimated cost to the district for this service would be a $350 per day consultant fee, plus an estimated $450 for consultant travel and expenses.
For some purposes, the board may meet in a closed session.
For example, the board meets in a closed session to address student disciplinary issues that require confidentiality.
2
OPPAGA
3-21
Management Structures
·
We also recommend that district staff, including the Finance director, and board members work together to identify the board's budget training needs.
The district should ensure that the training provided through FSBA is well coordinated with inhouse training on the district's zero-based budgeting approach.
4
Has the district clearly assigned authority to school administrators for the effective and efficient supervision of instruction, instructional support, and other assigned responsibilities, including consideration of site-based decision making and other organizational alternatives? Yes.
The district has clearly assigned authority to school principals and provided them with ample authority to manage their schools.
The district has given principals sufficient authority over school operations.
District principals believe that they have the authority they need to effectively serve as school leaders.
The district uses various mechanisms to ensure that principals understand their authority.
These include procedures manuals, thorough principal internship and training programs, and the oversight provided by the district's five area assistant superintendents.
The principals participating in our focus groups believe that they have clearly assigned and sufficient authority to achieve school goals.
They said that the superintendent strongly supports their role as the chief executive officers of their schools.
Principals said that they receive the guidance they need to understand the extent of their site-based authority.
They reported that this authority is clearly communicated in district manuals and handbooks.
They also reported that they can ask their area assistant superintendent for clarification if a situation comes up in which they are uncertain about their authority.
The district uses three methods to ensure that principals understand their authority over school operations.
It delineates principals' authority in key manuals such as the Human Resource Management and Development Plan and the Code of Student Conduct.
It conducts a comprehensive intern and training program for principals.
In addition, the district uses the five area assistant superintendents to monitor principals' performance and provide them with support to administer their schools in a manner that complies with district policies.
Principals have a good deal of authority over school resources.
They hire and evaluate their school-based staff.
Although schools' staffing levels are determined by a districtwide staffing plan, principals have some flexibility over how to allocate personnel resources.
For example, with the approval of the area assistant superintendent, a principal can exchange two full-time teacher aides for one full-time teacher.
The intent of the district's staffing plan is to equitably distribute resources among schools.
The plan makes principals responsible for allocating these resources in the best possible way to meet identified district objectives and individual school improvement goals.
The district has identified budgeting as an area where principals may need more site-based authority.
Principals currently have some budget flexibility.
They are given a discretionary fund and can carry forward funds in their budget to the next fiscal year.
However, only the district's technical centers and charter schools are operating under school-based budgets.
3-22 OPPAGA
Management Structures
The district is exploring the option of school-based budgeting for all its schools and is planning to study the way this model has been implemented in other school districts.
The district informally assesses the authority it has assigned to school principals through its area assistant superintendents who interact with principals on a daily basis.
In addition, the district formed the Leadership Development Advisory Board to assess the leadership function of school principals and develop strategies to increase their effectiveness as school leaders.
The advisory board developed the district's Human Resource Management and Development Plan.
The only major frustration principals expressed about their ability to carry out their responsibilities was the difficulty they had in adhering to numerous, sometimes competing, state and district initiated directives.
For example, principals feel torn between the need to prepare their students to score well on the state's new tests for academic performance and to implement the district's initiative to change its reading curricula.
In addition, they reported that the training their teachers received on how to improve student performance and implement district initiatives is not always consistent; they sometimes get conflicting advice from one trainer to the next.
Recommendation ·
____________________________________________
The district should continue to use the five area assistant superintendents to monitor and support principals.
However, it should set up a mechanism to better coordinate the directives principals receive from the area assistant superintendents, assistant superintendents, district superintendent and, sometimes, board members.
The district should coordinate the training provided to schools.
The district should develop a master training schedule for school and district personnel.
Ideally, the schedule would include a brief description of the training and explain how it is linked to district goals and initiatives, such as the Pathway to Excellence and Comprehensive Core Curriculum.
This should provide information to improve the alignment of training with district initiatives and avoid duplication and inconsistency.
The district should include budget management training in the leadership training it provides to school principals.
·
·
OPPAGA
3-23
Management Structures
Are the Best Practices for Decision Making and Resource Allocation Being Observed? _______________________________ Goal B: The district makes decisions and allocates resources in a manner that ensures the quality of education and minimizes administrative and other costs.
1
Does the district have a multi-year strategic plan with annual goals and measurable objectives based on identified needs, projected enrollment, and revenues? Yes.
The district has a multi-year strategic plan that includes annual goals and objectives.
The plan reflects state educational goals and is based on needs identified by representatives of the community, school board members and district staff.
However, the quality of the plan is uneven and a number of defects limit its usefulness as a planning tool.
The district developed its multi-year strategic plan in 1996.
The plan is based on a needs assessment conducted by representatives of the community, school board members, and school-based district staff.
It has the key components of a strategic plan, such as a vision statement, long-term goals, annual objectives, and an action plan and timetable for accomplishing each objective.
The plan is directly linked to the state's school improvement goals and addresses district goals in eight areas: Family and Community Involvement; Safe and Orderly Environment; Well-Trained and Qualified Staff; Technology; School-to-Work; Curriculum and Instruction; Operations; Funding and Finance.
The district's strategic plan has a number of defects that limit its usefulness as a planning tool.
A major problem with the plan is its overall lack of measurable objectives.
Objectives should be time-specific and defined in terms that can be used to measure or quantify progress.
A number of the objectives in the plan do meet these criteria.
However, the majority are broadly stated goals that are not measurable, such as "Provide technology support from the district."
In addition, the plan is more comprehensive than strategic.
It sets goals and objectives that address most aspects of district operations, but it does not set priorities.
With the exception of the Safe and Orderly Environment section, the plan's goals, objectives, and strategies are addressed as equally important.
Ideally, a strategic plan establishes clear priorities and shows how resources will be targeted to address these priorities.
3-24
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that the district revise its strategic plan to indicate the priority it places on the goals, objectives, and strategies in the plan.
The clarification of strategic priorities will assist the district in planning how to allocate resources and will help link the strategic planning process to the budgeting process.
We recommend that the district develop measurable objectives for each goal area and set clear guidelines for developing goals, objectives and strategies.
The strategic plan should include both long-term and annual goals.
Long-term goals should reflect the district's vision statement and set the district's strategic direction.
Annual goals should reflect the district priorities.
Objectives should show how goals will be met and how progress towards goals will be measured.
Strategies should provide an action plan for accomplishing each objective.
For more information on developing goals and objectives, see Chapter 4.
We recommend that the district clearly define the roles and responsibilities of board members, community representatives, and district staff at each stage of the strategic planning process.
The board and community representatives should be most actively involved in defining the district's strategic vision, setting strategic goals, and establishing priorities.
The superintendent and district staff should be primarily responsible for developing action plans to implement the district's vision and accomplish strategic goals.
The school board is responsible for approving the overall plan.
·
·
2
Does the district have a system to accurately project enrollments? Yes.
The district could improve its planning entities ordinances, land has a system to accurately project enrollments.
However, the district long-term enrollment projections through coordination with local to ensure that they have not overlooked the potential impact of local use regulations, and other factors on future enrollment growth.
District's Overall Enrollment Estimates Are Accurate The Department of Education works with school districts to forecast their full-time equivalent (FTE) students for the following year.
Districts base their forecast on state and county demographic data, FTE history for the state, the district's current FTE membership survey.
Districts can also factor in local conditions, such as the predicted impact of new programs on student membership.
District forecasts are submitted to the Department of Education and then reviewed and revised at the state level.
The FTE Calculating Conference Committee makes recommendations to the Legislature and these figures are used to determine districts' FEFP appropriations for the next fiscal year.
Polk's FTE enrollment projections are reasonably accurate.
Department of Education staff believe that error rates of less than 1% are acceptable.
For the past three fiscal years, Polk's total FTE enrollment forecasts have been off by less than 1% .
Exhibit 3-13 shows that Polk's error rate for the 1998-99 fiscal year is -0.9% , similar to the rate for its peers and within the department's acceptable margin.
OPPAGA
3-25
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-13
Accuracy of Polk's Enrollment Forecast for Fiscal Year 1998-99 Is Similar to Peers District Brevard Duval Pinellas Polk Seminole Volusia Projected Enrollment 68,476.83 128,081.62 110,870.00 76,837.64 57,973.62 59,892.99 Actual Enrollment 67,867.68 127,363,91 111,005.89 77,506.55 58,593.11 59,568.85 Difference Over (Under) Actual 609.15 717.71 (135.89) (668.91) (619.49) 324.14 Percent Variance 0.9% 0.6% -0.1% -0.9% -1.1% 0.5%
Source: FTE Forecasting History, Department of Education.
The District's Recent Exceptional Student Education Estimates Have Been Inaccurate For the last two fiscal years, the district's FTE enrollment projections for its exceptional education students have been less accurate than in previous years.
However, Department of Education and district staff do not believe that this problem is related to the district's forecasting methods, but primarily due to the district's difficulty in implementing the Department of Education's Matrix of Services.
In 1997, the Legislature changed the mechanism for funding exceptional student education from a model based on the student's type of exceptionality to a model based on the services the exceptional student receives.
Starting in 1997, districts have been required to use the department's matrix to assign exceptional education students to a service level category.
Since implementing the matrix, Polk has had difficulty with its Exceptional Student Education enrollment projections.
Problems with the matrix are not unique to Polk County.
For example, at the beginning of the 1998-99 school year, the Department of Education identified 26 districts requiring technical assistance to address FTE projection discrepancies related to problems with the matrix.
The District Projects Enrollments to Identify Current and Potential Growth In addition to developing FTE enrollment forecasts, the district routinely projects student enrollment to identify current growth and allocate personnel resources.
Staff annually forecast the enrollment for every grade level in each school in the district.
The district's enrollment projections are based on state demographic data and district computations using a cohort survival methodology.
Department heads, area assistant superintendents, and principals review the projections for each school and identify conditions that should be factored into the forecasts, such as new programs, housing starts, or increased inmigration due to a new industry.
While the district has a system to accurately estimate annual enrollments, it should take steps to improve its long-term projections.
The district has not used input from local planning entities to ensure that its projections adequately take into account factors, such as changes in land use regulations, that may impact growth over the long-term.
3-26
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that the district establish a mechanism for coordinating with local planning entities to take into account the potential impact of local ordinances, land use regulations, and other factors on the district's future enrollment growth.
(Related recommendations and an Action Plan for conducting a comprehensive districtwide demographic study are provided in Chapter 8.)
3
Does the district regularly assess its progress toward its strategic goals and objectives? Yes.
The district regularly assesses its progress toward strategic goals and objectives.
The school board conducts a one-day workshop for this purpose on an annual basis.
The district also publishes an annual report card on progress towards strategic objectives related to the superintendent's Agenda for Change.
In addition, the district's strategic planning committees monitor progress in each goal area and report their findings to the board.
However, the district has not updated or revised its strategic plan since it was developed in 1996.
The district uses three mechanisms to assess progress towards strategic goals and objectives.
The district contracts with a Florida School Boards Association consultant to conduct an annual workshop attended by the superintendent and board members to assess the accomplishment of strategic goals and to establish school board priorities for the next fiscal year.
The superintendent also publishes an annual report card on implementation of his Agenda for Change, composed of initiatives that have been incorporated into the strategic plan.
In addition, strategic planning committees monitor progress in each area of the strategic plan.
In 1998, each committee produced a status report on progress in its goal area, including recommendations related to district goals and objectives.
Although the district regularly reviews its progress toward strategic goals and objectives, the strategic plan has not been revised since it was written in 1996.
For example, the plan reflects neither the changes the district has made to its organizational structure in the past three years nor the progress noted in the 1998 status report.
However, the district has recognized the need for revision and intends to rewrite the plan based on recommendations in this report.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that the district comprehensively revise its strategic plan as soon as possible, making the improvements we outline in recommendations on page 325.
We also recommend that the district thoroughly revise its strategic plan at least every three years so that it accurately reflects the accomplishment of objectives, current priorities, and available resources.
The district should also update the action plans for each objective on an annual basis.
OPPAGA
3-27
Management Structures
·
District staff are well positioned to monitor the day-to-day implementation of strategic action plans.
The direct participation of district staff at this stage of the strategic planning process should be encouraged.
We recommend that the board revise its guidelines for membership on strategic planning committees to increase the direct participation of district staff.
In addition, district staff should regularly assess the status, feasibility, and effectiveness of the strategies or action plans for accomplishing each objective.
Strategies that have proven to be ineffective should be changed and the action plan revised.
Action plan revisions developed by district staff should be reviewed by the Strategic Plan Steering Committee and approved by the school board.
·
4
Does the district have an ongoing system of financial planning and budgeting linked to achievement of district goals and objectives, including student performance? Yes.
The district's budgetary process is linked to the achievement of district goals and objectives.
However, the district does not have a system in place to evaluate the performance of its operations and programs, so it does not have adequate information upon which to base its decisions about where to target its resources.
The district has a formal process to link its budget and expenditures to strategic goals and objectives.
Expenditure requests brought to the board must be cross-referenced to specific goals and objectives in the strategic plan.
The board requires a budget impact analysis for project and contract expenditures of $10,000 or more.
This analysis includes an assessment of the potential impact of the expenditure in terms of program outcomes, including student performance.
In addition, finance staff have revised the district's budget planning document to link the budget more directly to district goals and priorities.
For the 1999-2000 budget, divisions are required to develop department-level goals based on school board priorities, the superintendent's Vision for Improved Student Performance, and the strategic plan.
They are also required to identify the budget resources allocated to each goal, and provide indicators to measure progress towards each goal's accomplishment.
The district allocates its resources in a manner that is consistent with its strategic objectives and board priorities.
Last year, for example, the board approved funding for the expansion of its Behavior and Education Success Training (BEST) program, a program for students with severe disciplinary problems.
Expansion of the BEST program is part of the district's action plan for achieving strategic objectives related to district goals for a "safe and orderly environment."
The district also allocated approximately $500,000 of funds in the Division of Instructional Services budget to support the implementation of its new Comprehensive Core Curriculum.
Implementation of the Comprehensive Core Curriculum is an objective in the district's strategic plan and a current school board priority.
This school year the board voted to commit $7.5 million over the next five years to provide training for its teachers through the Leadership Learning Academy of Polk County.
This investment is consistent with the board's current priority of "continued emphasis on professional development" and strategic plan objectives related to a "well-trained and qualified staff."
The district could target its resources more effectively if it had better information to assess the performance and costs of its programs and operations.
However, the district does not
3-28
OPPAGA
Management Structures
have an adequate system in place for tracking performance and costs, nor does it conduct formal evaluations to determine the effectiveness of its major programs and initiatives.
In Chapter 4 we provide recommendations for addressing the district's assessment and evaluation needs.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
The district could target its resources more effectively if it had better information on program performance and district operations.
In Chapter 4 we recommend that the district develop an accountability system for monitoring and assessing program performance and costs.
We also recommend that the district formally evaluate its programs and operations on a periodic basis and use this information to direct resources where they are most needed and will be most effective.
Action Plan 4-4 shows how the district can implement these recommendations.
5
Do the district's management information systems provide data needed by management and instructional personnel in a reliable, timely, and cost-efficient manner? No.
Although the district's information systems contain useful data and staff handle requests for special reports in a timely manner, the systems need to be upgraded.
Major components of the financial information system are not integrated and the updating of budget information is delayed.
In addition, the district needs a comprehensive technology development plan to guide decisions about how to allocate resources for managing and upgrading its technology.
The district's management information systems are supported and maintained by two departments- Data Processing and Information Services.
Data Processing is responsible for the installation and maintenance of information system hardware, development of software, programming, and data processing.
Information Services works primarily with users of the Student Information System, providing technical assistance and training.
The Student Information System includes data such as student enrollment, academic history, course schedules, and immunization records.
The Information Services Department supervises use of the Student Information System by district and school-based staff to generate reports required by the Department of Education.
The District's Management Information Systems Have Major Limitations Although the district has recently upgraded features of its management information systems, the systems still have major limitations.
One limitation is that components of the finance system are not integrated, so users cannot readily access the data they need to track program costs.
For example, budget information on the system does not reflect purchase requisitions until they have been processed by the purchasing department and entered into the accounting system.
As a result, managers cannot use the system to access budget information that they know is up-to-date.
A number of principals in our focus
OPPAGA
3-29
Management Structures
group reported that it takes two months to get their purchase orders posted on the system.
(Limitations of the district's financial reporting and data processing systems are discussed in detail in Chapter 12 of this report.)
A further limitation of the district's management information systems is that administrators and instructional staff cannot readily access data in a form they can use to assess program performance and results.
The district's information systems were designed to support operations and provide data required by the state.
Staff can use the systems to obtain routine reports, but they often require assistance from programming staff to create special reports.
For example, principals in our focus group reported that they could not directly access longitudinal data on student performance or data to compare student attendance with student test scores.
While requests for these special reports are handled in a reliable and timely manner, the district needs to upgrade its information systems so that administrative and instructional staff can directly access the data they need to evaluate and improve program performance.
In addition, the district's management information systems lack adequate procedures to ensure the accuracy of data.
Student information and administrative data are centrally located and processed at the district level.
However, school-based personnel and department staff are responsible for entering and updating data in the system and the district has not established procedures to ensure that the data they enter are accurate.
For example, there are no procedures in place for schools to follow regarding supervisory checks of entered information or how source documents should be stored after data is entered.
OPPAGA provides recommendations for addressing these and other data accuracy issues in Chapter 4.
The District Does Not Have a Comprehensive Plan to Coordinate Technology Development The Technology section of the district's strategic plan addresses goals related to the use of information and instructional technology in schools.
However, it does not adequately address the short- or long-term needs of the district's management information system because it neglects aspects of the system related to administration or district operations.
While the district has set several goals for improving its instructional technology and upgrading its information management systems, the district does not have a comprehensive Technology Development Plan.3 Four committees currently address the planning and development of the district's information and instructional technology.
· · · · Technology Strategic Planning Committee Computer Advisory Committee Year 2000 Compliance Committee Finance System Task Force
However, there is no mechanism in place to coordinate or provide direction to the work of these four committees.
The Technology Strategic Planning Committee is responsible for updating the Technology section of the district's strategic plan and, as such, is well positioned to coordinate the various functions of the other three committees and provide
The Data Processing Department has developed a three-year plan for this purchase of hardware and software--its Capital Outlay List.
But, as the name implies, it is a list, not a plan.
3
3-30
OPPAGA
Management Structures
overall direction to the development of district technology.
The current composition of this committee, however, does not provide the level of expertise needed for this role.
Board guidelines for committee membership specify that district staff should function as resources to the committee rather than as members.
As a result, the direct participation of Data Processing, School Technology, and Information Services staff in the strategic planning process has been limited.
Without a comprehensive technology plan, the district has been unable to establish priorities for allocating its Data Processing, Information Services, and School Technology resources.
In addition, the lack of a high-level committee with the appropriate technological expertise has made it difficult for the district to set a clear direction for the development of its technology.
The District Has Not Formally Evaluated Users' Needs Aspects of the district's instructional and information technology have been examined in a number of recent reviews.
The 1997 organizational study conducted by the Florida Association of District School Superintendents (FADSS) assessed the district's technology and data systems.
The Auditor General reviewed the district's financial reporting and electronic data processing operations.
In addition, the school board's internal auditor recently assessed the status of the district's efforts to upgrade its financial reporting system.
However, the district has not formally evaluated its information and instructional technology to identify unmet user needs.
While the Data Processing, Information Services, and School Technology departments interact with users on a regular basis to solicit their input and identify problem areas, the district has not conducted a comprehensive evaluation to determine the extent to which its technology meets the needs of its administrative and instructional personnel.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that the district take immediate steps to develop a comprehensive three-year technology plan.
The plan should be consistent with the Technology section of the district's strategic plan, but more comprehensive and address all aspects of district technology--administrative and information systems as well as instructional technology.
The Technology Development Plan should include goals, annual measurable objectives, and an action plan for each objective.
It should clearly delineate who is responsible for accomplishing each objective and determine the staff required to implement each step in the action plans.
The plan should reflect district and school board priorities; goals and objectives in the technology section of the district's strategic plan; identified needs of information systems' users; identified school technology needs; identified upgrade priorities; and availability of district resources.
·
Action Plan 3-2 shows the steps the district needs to take to implement this recommendation.
OPPAGA
3-31
Management Structures
·
We also recommend that the district take immediate steps to address the limitations of its finance information system.
The district has decided to purchase a vendor-developed system and is in the process of selecting a vendor.
Recommendations related to factors the district should consider in making this decision are presented in Chapter 12 of this report.
Action Plan 3-2
The District Needs to Take the Following Steps to Develop a Comprehensive Three-Year Technology Plan Recommendation 1 Strategy Action Needed Develop a comprehensive three-year technology plan.
Step 1: The superintendent establishes a Technology Steering Committee.
The committee should include, but not be limited to, the senior director of Information Systems and Technology and the assistant superintendents.
Step 2: The Technology Steering Committee conducts a needs assessment of users of the district's information and instructional technology.
The committee should develop the needs assessment instrument in consultation with the Office of Planning, Accountability, and Evaluation; Technology Strategic Planning Committee; Computer Advisory Committee; Year 2000 Compliance Committee; and Finance System Task Force.
Step 3: The Technology Steering Committee identifies the district's technology development priorities based on the users' needs assessment, district strategic plan, school board priorities, and district resources.
Step 4: The Technology Steering Committee develops one-to-three year goals based on the district's identified technology priorities.
Step 5: The Technology Steering Committee develops measurable objectives, an implementation plan, and a timetable for meeting each goal.
The implementation plan should include an estimate of the resources, including staff resources, required to achieve each objective.
The timetable should reflect the anticipated availability of resources.
Step 6: The superintendent submits the three-year technology plan to the school board for its review and approval.
Step 7: The school board approves the plan.
The superintendent The plan should be completed by July 2000.
This can be implemented within existing resources.
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
3-32
OPPAGA
Management Structures
6
Does the district periodically evaluate operations to use evaluation results to improve the quality of education and reduce administrative and other costs? No.
The district does not formally evaluate its academic program and operations.
As a result, the district does not have the information it needs to determine what changes to make to reduce costs and improve its overall performance.
The district does not have a system for the formal evaluations of its major programs and operations.
The district regularly evaluates its Title I programs.
However, these evaluations are designed to comply with federal requirements they do not provide the kind of information the district needs to identify ways to improve program cost-effectiveness.
The district does assess the performance of its programs and operations on an ad hoc basis.
The board occasionally directs district staff to evaluate a specific program in response to an identified concern or issue.
For example, the assistant superintendent of Facilities and Operations recently reviewed the impact of staff reductions on energy costs.
The board may also direct program managers to brief them on the status of specific district initiatives.
The director of Elementary Education, for example, reported to the board on the impact of district strategies, such as the Success for All program, to improve students' reading.
While useful, these ad hoc assessments and briefings do not meet the criteria for a formal evaluation.
They vary in content and quality and are typically carried out by the manager of the program being evaluated.
Formal program evaluations should be independently conducted by evaluation staff.
In addition, the district does not have a system to reward staff for recommending costsaving measures.
The superintendent has challenged staff to find ways to cut administrative costs to direct more dollars to the classroom.
Also, principals who reduce their school's energy costs are able to use a portion of these savings for school-based projects.
However, the district does not have a system for recognizing or rewarding recommendations that result in cost savings.
The District Needs to Determine How to Best Use Its Evaluation Resources The school board and district staff have recognized the need for program evaluation.
The board has established the Program Evaluation Committee, hired a supervisor of Evaluation and Research, and started a process to determine the order in which programs should be evaluated.
The Program Evaluation Committee recently compiled a list of over 90 programs and board members have reviewed this list to select programs they think should be evaluated first.
The district's strategic plan proposes that all district programs be evaluated at least every other year.
However, given the district's limited evaluation resources, this ambitious agenda is unrealistic.
The district needs to develop a plan for determining when and where to invest its limited evaluation resources.
The identification of which programs to formally evaluate may be approached in a number of ways.
In Chapter 4, we recommend an action plan for the routine collection and assessment of program performance and cost data.
This process should provide the district with information on an annual basis to identify programs that
OPPAGA
3-33
Management Structures
require a more formal evaluation.
For example, if a program does not perform according to expectations, the district may want to conduct a formal evaluation to identify conditions that have caused costs to increase or performance to decline.
In Chapter 4, we also suggest factors the district should consider in selecting programs for formal evaluation, such as the funding level of the program, number of students served, potential for cost savings, and risks or consequences if the program is ineffective.
Whatever factors the district decides to consider, it needs to plan how it will allocate its evaluation resources to ensure that they are used in an efficient manner.
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
The district should develop a plan for the formal evaluation of its program.
These evaluations should be conducted by evaluation staff, outside consultants, or the board auditor.
Action Plan 3-3 provides the action steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 3-3
The District Needs to Develop a Plan for the Formal Evaluation of Its Programs Recommendation 1 Strategy Action Needed Develop an annual plan for the formal evaluation of programs.
Step 1: Develop an annual plan for the formal evaluation of programs and program areas.
Step 2: Identify programs and program areas to be evaluated based on criteria such as · evidence that the program is not performing according to expectations; · program funding level; · number of students served by the program; · cost to the district to conduct the evaluation; · availability of resources to conduct the evaluation; · potential for program improvement or cost savings; · potential risk or consequences that may result from ineffective program performance; · length of time since the program' s last evaluation; and · public input or concern.
Step 3: Present the plan to the school board annually for review and approval.
(For more information on formal evaluations, refer to Action Plan 4-4, page 4-32.)
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Office of Planning, Accountability, and Evaluation with input from the school board, board auditor, superintendent, assistant superintendents, and program directors.
The plan should be completed by February 2000.
3-34
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Fiscal impact
No additional resources are required.
7
Does the district consider local options to increase revenue? Yes.
The district has considered and implemented most available local options to increase revenue.
The district has imposed the maximum millage property tax the state allows for capital outlay and has considered a half-cent sales tax.
In addition, the district generates significant revenue through its educational foundation and discretionary grants.
The district has considered and implemented a variety of local options to increase revenue.
For example, the district has imposed a two-mill property tax for capital outlay projects.
The two-mill capital outlay property tax is the maximum millage the state allows the district to impose for capital outlay purposes.
This tax should generate approximately $25.8 million.
The district also raises local revenue through the Polk Educational Foundation.
The district's foundation earned $998,917 from special events, contributions, and interest income during Fiscal Year 1997-98.
The state has recently given school boards the ability to request voters to approve up to a half-cent sales tax for school construction, renovation, and technology.
The Polk County School Board has considered asking local voters for such a tax.
However, the board did not believe that it could obtain voter approval for the sales tax initiative because the county commission was placing a separate request for an additional sales tax on the ballot in the 1998 general election.
When two sales tax initiatives are placed on the same ballot, both usually fail.
According to the superintendent, the school board will probably revisit the possibility of pursuing a sales tax initiative later this year.
The district also generates revenue through grants and other forms of discretionary funding.
Its Office of Planning, Accountability and Evaluation has developed information packets to assist staff in the identification of alternative funding sources, including state and federal grants.
For Fiscal Year 1998-99, the district obtained at total of $1,459,097 through discretionary state and federal grants.
In addition, the district is billing Medicaid for Medicaid-reimbursable services it provides to eligible students.
During calendar year 1998, the district obtained $743,471.23 in Medicaid reimbursements.
Recommendation · We recommend that the Polk County School Board continue to consider placing a sales tax initiative on the ballot.
The board and superintendent should determine whether community leaders, businesses, and the chamber of commerce would be willing to support such a tax.
They should work with these and other stakeholders to develop ways to educate voters on why the district needs sales tax revenues and how it will impact the district's ability to provide quality education services in a cost-effective manner.
OPPAGA
3-35
Management Structures
8
Does the district use cost-efficient legal services to review policy and reduce the risk of lawsuits? Yes.
The district has hired an attorney to represent the board, and the attorney makes recommendations designed to reduce the district's risk of lawsuits or legal actions.
The district also contracts for legal services when necessary to perform routine legal work, to represent the board in lawsuits, and to advise and represent the superintendent.
The District Has an Attorney to Advise the Board The district maintains an in-house general counsel to represent the board.
This attorney performs a number of routine legal services, including reviewing the board's agenda items and background materials and giving the board legal advice on policies to reduce the risk of lawsuits.
He also reviews contracts.
According to the board attorney, he receives the board's agenda and supporting materials in a timely manner and has sufficient time to review them for legal concerns before the board meets.
The board attorney has determined criteria for recommending that the board contract with private attorneys for legal services.
For example, in cases which require special expertise or involve litigation, the board contracts with private attorneys.
In addition, because the board's routine legal workload is more than one in-house attorney can reasonably handle, it has entered into a contract with a local law firm to obtain routine legal services on a parttime basis.
Finally, to avoid conflict of interest, the board attorney does not represent the superintendent, who contracts for legal services when necessary.
The District Pays Reasonable Rates for Routine Legal Services The salary and benefits the Polk County School District pays for its routine legal services are comparable to the salaries and benefits paid by peer districts.
The salaries (not including benefits) paid by Polk's peer districts range between $84, 000 and $107,832.
The salary for Polk's board attorney is $85,000.
The Polk County School District also appears to be getting its contracted routine legal services at a reasonable hourly rate.
The district pays its part-time attorney $100 an hour.
The hourly rate paid by Polk's peer districts ranges from $90 to $150.
The Polk County School District segregates its legal costs from other costs and can track the costs of all of the legal services provided to the board and superintendent.
However, the usefulness of comparing these costs to the legal costs of other districts is limited because not all districts account for their legal costs in the same manner and because of differences in district litigation rates and the types of cases being litigated.
The District Assesses the Cost-Effectiveness of Using Staff or Contract Attorneys for Routine Legal Services The district is currently assessing the cost-effectiveness of continuing its contract for routine legal services with the private law firm or hiring a second staff attorney.
According to the board attorney, the district has given him a budget he can use to either hire a second
3-36
OPPAGA
Management Structures
attorney or continue the current contract for part-time legal services.
The advantage obtaining a second staff attorney is that the attorney's services would be available on time basis.
The advantage of continuing to contract with the private legal firm is the level of experience of the attorneys within the firm.
Thus the decision about whether to hire a second attorney will probably depend on whether the district can attract an attorney with a reasonable degree of experience within the amount budgeted.
of a fullhigh or not
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
The district's board attorney should obtain information about the salaries attorneys typically receive in Polk County.
If it appears that the district may be able to attract an experienced staff attorney for the amount the board has budgeted, the board attorney should advertise for a new staff attorney.
9
Does the district periodically evaluate the prices it pays for goods and services and, when appropriate, use state-negotiated contracts, competitive bidding, outsourcing, or other alternatives to reduce costs? Yes.
The district periodically evaluates the price it pays for goods and services and uses other alternatives to reduce costs.
However, the district's assessments of the cost-effectiveness of providing services through district staff or through contracts do not always include all relevant costs and some assessments may be based on incorrect assumptions.
The district periodically examines the price it pays for goods and services to determine whether it is getting the lowest price.
It also purchases goods through consortiums or state contracts when it is cost effective to do so.
For example, it purchases its school buses through a state-run program that allows school districts to obtain volume discounts by combining their orders for new school buses.
It belongs to the Bay Area Schools Purchasing Consortium, a 13-member coalition of entities that share best practices and bid results.
It has on-line access to Department of Management Services state contracts and routinely compares the bids it receives to state contract prices.
The district also assesses the cost-effectiveness of providing services with district staff or obtaining the services from private contractors.
For example, it contracted with a private company to provide cleaning supplies and manage custodial services and periodically determines the cost savings produced by this contract.
In addition, the district has assessed whether it could reduce costs by privatizing its warehouse operations, and has assessed the costs of providing occupational therapy and printing services with in-house staff or private providers.
Exploring "make" versus "buy" decisions allows the district to look for opportunities to save money without a loss of service or quality.
However, we found that the district does not always base its decisions on adequate information.
Assessments of the cost-effectiveness of providing services in-house or through private providers should consider a number of factors.
One key factor is whether there is reliable and complete cost data to support "make" versus "buy" decisions.
Other factors that should be considered include whether OPPAGA 3-37
Management Structures
there is sufficient commercial activity in the area to promote competition among the private providers.
Additional factors include whether the quality and performance of private providers can be assessed and whether controls can be put in place to maintain accountability for public funds.
The district should also consider the potential impact that changes in service delivery may have on employees.
Does the district have plans for employees who may not be needed if a particular service is privatized or should the contractor be required to hire any displaced employees? These factors, as well as others, are important in any "make" versus "buy" decision.
We reviewed five of the district's assessments, some of which were limited in scope (performed on an ad hoc basis) while others were more comprehensive.
As shown in Exhibit 3-14, these privatization assessments varied in quality because some did not address a number of relevant factors or include all costs.
For example, district staff calculated the cost savings of using in-house staff rather than private contractors to provide occupational therapy services.
However, this study did not include the cost of the employee benefits in-house staff receive and thus understated the costs of using staff therapists by about 30% .
None of the district's assessments adequately addressed considerations relating to contract administration costs.
Other assessments were based on questionable assumptions.
For example, when the district calculated the cost savings derived from the contract for the management of custodial services, most of the identified cost savings resulted from custodians being responsible for cleaning and maintaining additional square footage of space.
Although at least part of this increase occurred with the advent of new cleaning technologies and the construction of new, easier-to-clean buildings, the district's cost assessment assumed it would not have changed the number of square feet cleaned by custodians unless it entered into the contract.
Furthermore, the district did not look at the ratios in other districts to test the validity of this assumption.
Only two of the five district privatization assessments we reviewed appeared to use reasonable assumptions and to include all relevant costs, and those were the two cost-effectiveness studies of privately or district-operated warehousing services.
Although the assessments we reviewed could be improved, the district commended for studying service delivery options.
Even if assessments that it would reduce costs to change the manner in which services are information gained can help the district to become more cost efficient.
reviews can provide assurances to the public that the district is taking opportunities for cost savings.
should be do not determine being provided, the In addition, these steps to identify
3-38
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Exhibit 3-14
Most of the Polk County School District's Assessments of Providing Services With District Staff or Through Contracts Did Not Adequately Consider All Relevant Factors Food School Occupation Warehous and Office Custodial al e Supplies Services Therapists 1.
Commercial Activity ­ did the district consider whether the service could be obtained through private vendors? 2.
Quality/Performance ­ did the district consider how quality of service could be affected if services are contracted rather than provided in-house? 3.
Control/Accountability ­ did the district consider how it would monitor the service provider and consider performance criteria?
Printing 3
3
3 3 X
3 3 3
3
O 3
O X
O X
4.
Cost Comparison A.
In-house Personnel Cost ­ did the district consider the total cost of salaries and benefits of in-house staff providing the service? Materials and Supplies ­ did the district consider the total materials and supplies cost of providing the service in-house? Other Costs ­ did the district consider all other costs of providing the service in-house?
3 3 3
3 3 3
X 3 X
O X X
3 3 3
B. Contracted Contract Price ­ did the district compare the contract cost to the cost of providing the service in-house? Contract Administration ­ did the district consider the cost to monitor the contractor's performance and other costs of administering the contract? Other Costs ­ did the district consider any other costs involved in privatizing the contract? One -Time Costs ­ did the district consider if any one-time costs would be applicable, such as severance pay to displaced employees? 5.
Employee Considerations ­ did the district consider whether distract staff would be displaced and whether the contractor would be required to hire these staff?
3 X 3 N/A N/A
3 X X N/A N/A
3 X 3 N/A 3
3 X X N/A N/A
O X X N/A N/A
3 Adequately considered
O
Partly considered
X
Not Adequately considered
N/A Did not apply
OPPAGA
3-39
Management Structures
Recommendations ·
__________________________________________
We recommend that the superintendent direct the assistant superintendent of Business Services to develop a uniform methodology for district staff to use to determine the cost-effectiveness of providing services with district staff or through contracts with private providers.
To accomplish this, we recommend that the assistant superintendent of Business Services work with other departments in developing a methodology.
The cost of in-house service provision should include all direct costs of providing a service and any indirect costs that could be reduced by contracting the service out.
These in-house costs should include the following: personnel costs--the salaries and benefits of district staff that would be needed to provide the services, including adjustments anticipated for salary increases; material and supplies costs--the cost of materials or supplies the district would need to provide the service if these materials will be supplied by the private contractor; and other costs ­ any other costs that can be attributed to in-house provision of service including depreciation, cost of capital, rent, maintenance and repair, utilities, insurance, travel, and any overhead (personnel, payroll, etc.) costs that can be cut back if the district contracts for the service.
·
Similarly, the potential cost of contracting out a service should include the three elements below.
Contract price--the price the private contractor wants for providing the service.
If this price is an hourly rate, it should be multiplied by a realistic estimate of the number of hours the contractor will spend providing the service.
For example, if the contractor is to provide the district a full-time position, the number of hours should reflect the likely amount of time that person may miss work due to illness, vacation, etc.
Contract administration costs--the costs district staff incur monitoring compliance with the contract terms, processing payments, and negotiating change orders.
It should not include inspection or other administrative functions the district would perform if district staff performed the service.
Additional costs--any other costs the district may incur as a result of the contracted service.
In addition, the district should consider any one-time costs it may incur as a result of contracting out the service, such as the cost of severance pay to displaced district staff or the gain or losses associated with disposal of assets the district will not need when the service is performed by contract.
·
When developing its guidelines, the district may wish to review the Federal Office of Management and Budget's Circular No.
A-76 Supplement, which provides federal agencies with guidance on comparing the costs of providing services inhouse or through contract.
In addition to price, the district needs to develop guidelines on the questions that need to be addressed in making privatization decisions.
These questions could include:
·
3-40
OPPAGA
Management Structures
Is it appropriate to privatize this function? Will privatizing the service improve performance? Are there problems with current delivery of the service? Are there examples demonstrating that the private sector can perform the function more effectively or at a lower cost? Does the service involve expertise the district does not need on an ongoing basis? Will privatization be resisted by district staff, parents, or other stakeholders? If so, how can the district overcome this resistance? Is the service already performed by the private sector? Is the market for the service competitive? Will the district be able to switch service providers without seriously disrupting services or incurring high costs? Do district staff know how to collect the cost and performance data needed to monitor the private provider? What will be done with the district's current facilities, technology, and other resources? Are there any federal or state laws or district policies that could inhibit privatization or a change in private providers? If services are ongoing, have long-term costs been identified? What will the district do if the private contractor cannot meet contractual obligations? How much will it cost for the district to resume in-house provision of the service? Will district staff be allowed to compete with the private sector? What does the district plan to do with staff who are no longer needed because of privatization? Will privatization limit or enhance the district's ability to meet equal opportunity obligations? Can the district keep needed control of and accountability for privatized services? What criteria will be used to judge the performance of the private contractor? Are enough funds budgeted for oversight and quality control? · After district staff use these guidelines to assess "make" versus "buy" decisions, we recommend that the internal auditor review the studies for adherence to the guidelines before the recommendations go to the board.
This will help ensure that the board receives the information it needs to make good decisions.
The district can implement these recommendations with existing resources.
·
OPPAGA
3-41
